dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.dic
aizbubināties/>- po:darbv31a
aizčaukstināties/>- po:darbv31a
aizdrebināties/>- po:darbv31a
aizguvums/OoPp po:lietv1r
aizklakšķināties/>- po:darbv31a
aizknibināties/>- po:darbv31a
aizlavīties/>- po:darbv32a
aizrisināties/>- po:darbv31a
aizstāvētājs/Oox po:lietv1r
aizstāvis/Qq po:lietv2r
aiztīksmināties/>- po:darbv31a
aiztrinkšķināties/>- po:darbv31a
ākstīties/>- po:darbv32a
Alfons/OoPp po:lietv1i
alkilhlorsilāns/Oo po:lietv1r
aloties/<- po:darbv22a
amīds/Oo po:lietv1r
Andris/QqRr po:lietv2i
apakšlogs/OoPp po:lietv1r
apakšnieks/OoPpx po:lietv1r
apmaksātājs/Oox po:lietv1r
apnikums/Oo po:lietv1r
apstrādājums/Oo po:lietv1r
apziņotājs/Oox po:lietv1r
Artūrs/OoPp po:lietv1i
atblandīties/>- po:darbv32a
atdižoties/<- po:darbv22a
atindētājs/Oox po:lietv1r
atluncināties/>- po:darbv31a
atomdzinējs/Oo po:lietv1r
atstāsts/Oo po:lietv1r
atvietotājs/Oox po:lietv1r
augkopis/Qqx po:lietv2r
aušoties/<- po:darbv22a
avanss/OoPp po:lietv1r
bankets/OoPp po:lietv1r
bezmēns/OoPp po:lietv1r
beztiesiskums/Oo po:lietv1r
bīdeklis/Qq po:lietv2r
blēņdaris/QqRrx po:lietv2r
brāļoties/<- po:darbv22a
brīnīties/>- po:darbv32a
bruņnieciskums/Oo po:lietv1r
burukuģis/QqRr po:lietv2r
cālēns/OoPp po:lietv1r
cienasts/Oo po:lietv1r
čiepstētājs/Oox po:lietv1r
daikts/OoPp po:lietv1r
dancinātājs/Oox po:lietv1r
dārgakmens/Qq po:lietv2r
dežūrveikals/Oo po:lietv1r
dialektologs/Oox po:lietv1r
dihlorsalicilanilīds/Oo po:lietv1r
dīvāns/OoPp po:lietv1r
dižmanis/Qq po:lietv2r
draudzēties/<- po:darbv24a
Dzeguzēni/o po:lietv2i
Džonsons/O
Egils/OoPp po:lietv1i
eirokomisārs/Oox po:lietv1r
eklektiķis/Qqx po:lietv2r
ēzelēns/Oo po:lietv1r
fakts/OoPp po:lietv1r
farizejs/Oo po:lietv1r
frakcionārs/Oox po:lietv1r
futrālis/Qq po:lietv2r
ganāmpulks/OoPp po:lietv1r
gazolīns/Oo po:lietv1r
ginks/Oo po:lietv1r
griezējnazis/Qq po:lietv2r
gurns/OoPp po:lietv1r
Gustavs/OoPp po:lietv1i
handbolists/Oox po:lietv1r
herolds/Oo po:lietv1r
hidromotors/Oo po:lietv1r
ieblandīties/>- po:darbv32a
iečirkstēties/>- po:darbv33a
iedraudzēties/<- po:darbv24a
iegāgināties/>- po:darbv31a
ieliktnis/QqRr po:lietv2r
iemanīties/>- po:darbv32a
ierausējs/Oo po:lietv1r
iešķirotājs/Oox po:lietv1r
ietvars/OoPp po:lietv1r
ievads/OoPp po:lietv1r
īgņoties/<- po:darbv22a
ilgiedzīvotājs/Oox po:lietv1r
izčaukstināties/>- po:darbv31a
izdīžāties/<- po:darbv21a
izelpojums/Oo po:lietv1r
izķepuroties/<- po:darbv22a
izlabināties/>- po:darbv31a
izonitrils/Oo po:lietv1r
izpostītājs/Oox po:lietv1r
izpriecāties/<- po:darbv21a
izšausmināties/>- po:darbv31a
jaguārs/OoPp po:lietv1r
jahtklubs/OoPp po:lietv1r
Jorens/OoPp po:lietv1i
jūds/OoPp po:lietv1r
jūrasaugs/Oo po:lietv1r
kadiķis/QqRr po:lietv2r
kāpējs/OoPp po:lietv1r
kāpiens/Oo po:lietv1r
kāposts/OoPp po:lietv1r
karāties/<- po:darbv21a
kārotājs/Oox po:lietv1r
klabeklis/Qq po:lietv2r
Klāvs/OoPp po:lietv1i
kleptomāns/Oo po:lietv1r
klubs/OoPp po:lietv1r
knosīties/>- po:darbv32a
komerclikums/Oo po:lietv1r
koncertmākslinieks/Oox po:lietv1r
kormeistars/Oox po:lietv1r
krateklis/Qq po:lietv2r
krekls/OoPp po:lietv1r
krēsls/OoPp po:lietv1r
kubikcentimetrs/Oo po:lietv1r
kurts/OoPp po:lietv1r
ķeburs/OoPp po:lietv1r
ķepuroties/<- po:darbv22a
ķūlis/Qq po:lietv2r
labinieks/Oox po:lietv1r
lancetnieks/Oo po:lietv1r
lielums/OoPp po:lietv1r
liktenis/Qq po:lietv2r
lūkotājs/Oox po:lietv1r
Madars/OoPp po:lietv1i
magnetizētājs/Oox po:lietv1r
Magnuss/OoPp po:lietv1i
maigoties/<- po:darbv22a
mēdijs/Oo po:lietv1r
meistardziedonis/Qqx po:lietv2r
meteorologs/Oox po:lietv1r
metilglikolacetāts/Oo po:lietv1r
mīnuss/OoPp po:lietv1r
mitraudzis/Qq po:lietv2r
mīts/OoPp po:lietv1r
montējums/Oo po:lietv1r
nags/OoPp po:lietv1r
nekrietnelis/Qqx po:lietv2r
nesaspringums/Oo po:lietv1r
niacīns/Oo po:lietv1r
nītaurietis/Qqx po:lietv2r
noālēties/<- po:darbv24a
nobrīnīties/>- po:darbv32a
nodižoties/<- po:darbv22a
nokautrēties/<- po:darbv24a
nominstināties/>- po:darbv31a
noniķoties/<- po:darbv22a
norotaļāties/<- po:darbv21a
noteicējs/Oo po:lietv1r
notīksmināties/>- po:darbv31a
noturētājs/Oox po:lietv1r
nozvāroties/<- po:darbv22a
nožēlotājs/Oox po:lietv1r
Oļģerts/OoPp po:lietv1i
Orests/OoPp po:lietv1i
paboksēties/<- po:darbv24a
pacīkstēties/>- po:darbv33a
padumpoties/<- po:darbv22a
pakautrēties/<- po:darbv24a
pamaigoties/<- po:darbv22a
pamatganāmpulks/Oo po:lietv1r
pamatraksts/Oo po:lietv1r
panamietis/Qqx po:lietv2r
papildkomponents/Oox po:lietv1r
papretoties/<- po:darbv22a
pārbužināties/>- po:darbv31a
pārdraiskoties/<- po:darbv22a
pārlaiskoties/<- po:darbv22a
pārplunčāties/<- po:darbv21a
pārspriedējs/Oo po:lietv1r
pāršķīstīties/<- po:darbv23a
pārtinējs/Oo po:lietv1r
pārūjināties/>- po:darbv31a
pastāstītājs/Oox po:lietv1r
pašķendēties/<- po:darbv24a
pašsadedzināties/>- po:darbv31a
Pāvils/OoPp po:lietv1i
pētījums/OoPp po:lietv1r
pieknubināties/>- po:darbv31a
piekūns/OoPp po:lietv1r
pieķēzītājs/Oox po:lietv1r
piesargāties/>- po:darbv31a
piesūceknis/QqRr po:lietv2r
pirmatskaņotājs/Oox po:lietv1r
polimetafosfāts/Oo po:lietv1r
polivinilhlorīds/Oo po:lietv1r
pretoties/<- po:darbv22a
pretsolis/Qq po:lietv2r
proponents/Oox po:lietv1r
puds/OoPp po:lietv1r
puķupods/OoPp po:lietv1r
pumpējums/Oo po:lietv1r
pusvārds/Oo po:lietv1r
radioteātris/Qq po:lietv2r
reģistrators/Oox po:lietv1r
retinilpalmitāts/Oo po:lietv1r
Ričs/OoPp po:lietv1i
riets/OoPp po:lietv1r
robežrezervāts/Oo po:lietv1r
rumānis/Qq po:lietv2r
sadūšoties/<- po:darbv22a
sakaunēties/>- po:darbv33a
salasītājs/Oox po:lietv1r
sāpinājums/Oo po:lietv1r
sārņoties/<- po:darbv22a
saudzīgums/Oo po:lietv1r
sektors/OoPp po:lietv1r
sencis/Qq po:lietv2r
sensors/OoPpW po:lietv1r
simtdivdesmitpiecgadnieks/Oox po:lietv1r
sirdsdraugs/Oo po:lietv1r
skursteņslauķis/Qq po:lietv2r
slaikums/OoPp po:lietv1r
slāņainums/Oo po:lietv1r
slapstīties/>- po:darbv32a
slazds/OoPp po:lietv1r
staigātājs/Oox po:lietv1r
standartierocis/Qq po:lietv2r
strādnieks/Oox po:lietv1r
subjekts/OoPp po:lietv1r
sultāns/OoPp po:lietv1r
šķeltnis/Qq po:lietv2r
šķērsnorobežojums/O po:lietv1r
tallinietis/Qqx po:lietv2r
tehnologs/Oox po:lietv1r
telefons/OoPp po:lietv1r
tēls/OoPp po:lietv1r
tienesis/Qq po:lietv2r
trijjūgs/OoPp po:lietv1r
tuvinieks/Oox po:lietv1r
ūdenspumpis/Qq po:lietv2r
ūnikums/Oo po:lietv1r
untums/OoPp po:lietv1r
uzbērums/OoPp po:lietv1r
uzdarboties/<- po:darbv22a
uzlabināties/>- po:darbv31a
vaiņagojums/Oo po:lietv1r
varonis/Qqx- po:lietv2r
vekselis/Qq po:lietv2r
Vidvuds/OoPp po:lietv1i
Viesturs/OoPp po:lietv1i
Virgīlijs/OoPp po:lietv1i
virssulainis/Qq po:lietv2r
vistkopis/Qqx po:lietv2r
zemessūcējs/Oo po:lietv1r
Zigurds/OoPp po:lietv1i
zīmējums/OoPp po:lietv1r
zooinženieris/Qqx po:lietv2r
